Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2334.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 8, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 36-917 and 36-918, to read: START_STATUTE36-917. Food articles; messenger ribonucleic acid; prohibition; definitions A. any article of Food, including livestock, poultry and produce, or prepared food that is offered for retail sale in this state may not include any article that has been implanted with or received a messenger ribonucleic acid vaccine. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Livestock" has the same meaning prescribed in section 3-1201. 2. "Poultry" has the same meaning prescribed in section 3-1201. 3. "Produce" has the same meaning prescribed in section 3-525.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE36-918. Labeling; country of origin; vaccination and medication information; signage; definitions A. The manufacturer, packager or retailer of each article of Food, including livestock, poultry and produce, or prepared food that is offered for retail sale in this state shall place a label on the food product's packaging that includes: 1. The name of the country in which each article of the food product originated. 2. A listing of each country that has altered the food product. 3. For livestock and poultry, vaccination and medication information. B. Notwithstanding any other law, the producer or packager of all produce for sale in this state that is labeled as "organic" shall include on the label the name of each spray and coating that is applied to the produce. If the organic produce is sold without a package, the retailer shall provide signage for each type of produce that includes the name of each spray and coating that is applied to the produce. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Livestock" has the same meaning prescribed in section 3-1201. 2. "Poultry" has the same meaning prescribed in section 3-1201. 3. "Produce" has the same meaning prescribed in section 3-525.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Effective date This act is effective from and after December 31, 2026.